District of Columbia statutes.
29-1111

Member has no agency power.

A member of an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not be an agent of the association solely by reason of being a member.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 15 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).